Illinois, session 104th, HB5518.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-70 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-70 new)7    Sec. 5-70. Marketplace health insurance subsidy repayment. 8No later than 180 days after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 10shall file a proposed rule, or a proposed amendment to an 11existing rule, that requires the Department to notify, in 12writing, all medical assistance applicants that if, at the 13time of application, the applicant is enrolled in an active 14health insurance plan bought through the Illinois health 15insurance marketplace, then the applicant is subject to the 16repayment of any and all subsidies received for the active 17health insurance plan if the applicant is determined eligible 18for and receives medical assistance while still maintaining 19coverage under the active health insurance plan. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.